output/hyph-id.level7.pat.txt
.aba3h
.ab5akt
.aba4l
.aba4r
.abe5
.abu4k
.acak3
.ada5t
.ad3io
.aduk3
.af3al
.af3r
.aga3h4
.aga4r
.ago5
.ag3r
.agro5
.air2
.ai3ra
.ai4s
.aja4
.ajak3
.ajar3
.ajo3
.aka3b
.aka4l7
.aka4n3
.akana5
.aka6r5a
.ak3lo
.ak5r
.ak6ras
.al2a
.ala5m
.alan5a
.ala4p
.alas3
.ala3t
.alem3
.alimu5
.alut4
.alu5ta
.am2a
.ama5ti
.ampa5r6
.amuk3
.an4a
.andu5k
.ang4a
.angan5
.angge6
.angi7
.an7gin
.angka6l
.anjak5
.anja5l
.anyam5
.ap3l
.ap5r
.ar2a
.ara4k
.arak5a
.ara4m3
.arka3
.aru5b
.as2a
.asa5hi
.asa4m3
.as5int
.asul3
.as3w
.at2a
.ato5n
.at3ud
.au3t
.awa4r
.awi3
.aya2
.ayak3
.ayum5
.baba5t
.ba3h4a
.baka5r6
.ba3ki
.ba5l4a
.ba5ng6a
.ba5ngi
.bantar6
.ba3r4a
.bara7n
.ba5ri
.ba5sa
.ba3t4a
.ba3ti
.batik5
.beba5l
.be5lan
.be5le
.be5li
.be4ra
.ber5al
.beras6a
.be6ria.
.be3sa
.bi3h
.bi5la
.bios5k
.bi3sa
.bo3ha
.bo3ki
.bo3la
.bo3sa
.bo5si
.bo3t
.bri5sa
.bu3ka
.bu5la
.bu5ng6a
.bu3ni
.bu1t
.ca3ki
.ca3p4a
.car4
.ca3ra
.carik5
.ce5nga
.ce3ra
.ci3l
.ci5nga
.co3l
.cua3t
.cu5l2
.cu3ma
.cup5l
.cu5ra
.cu3ti
.da3h4a
.da3hi
.da3ki
.da3m4a
.da3mi
.da5ri
.debar5
.de3ka
.de5l4a
.de5ng6a
.depak5
.de5ra
.derak5
.di3e
.di5ka
.di5nga
.di3pa
.dip3l
.di3tr
.do3ka
.do5la
.do5ng6a
.do3r4a
.do5ri
.du3ka
.du3pi
.ece2
.ef3l
.eg3r
.ek3l
.ek5r
.eks5tr
.el2a
.elo1
.emana5
.embel5
.embi4
.embik5
.ena2
.enak3
.era2
.ere4
.erek3
.erot5a
.es5t
.eu5t
.faa3
.fi3la
.fi2r
.ga3k
.ga5l4a
.galeng6
.ga3ma
.ga5na
.ga5ng6a
.ga5ni
.ga5p4a
.gapu5
.ga3r4a
.gasak5
.gat4
.ga3ti
.ge5l
.genomi6
.ge5pre
.gerak5
.ge3t
.gi5na
.gi3r
.gi5s
.gi5t
.goi3
.gole5k
.go3s
.go3t
.guda7
.gudang6
.gu3la
.gu5li
.gu3p
.gu5ra
.gu5si
.ha3s4a
.ha3ti
.haya3
.hi3l
.ho3k
.ho3li
.hu1t
.ikan3
.ika5p
.ika4t3
.iku2
.ikur3
.ikut3
.ilat3
.imig3
.in2a
.in3ad
.in3ar
.in3ef
.in3er
.ing6i4
.in5gu.
.injak5
.in3ok
.in3os
.ir2a
.iri3t
.is5ent
.is5k
.ja5ba
.ja1h2
.ja5l
.jala7
.ja3m4a
.ja5mi
.ja5ng6a
.ja3p
.ja3r4a
.jarak5
.je5nga
.je5ra
.ji3r
.jo3ra
.jo3t
.juju5t
.ju3ni
.ju5r4a
.ka3h4a
.ka3ki
.ka5l4a
.ka5li
.ka5n4a
.ka3p4a
.ka5pi
.ka3r4a
.ka5ri
.ka3t4a
.ka3ti
.ka7us
.kawa5s
.ke5li
.ke5na
.ke5ra
.keras6a
.ke3sw
.ke3ta
.kia4s
.ki1h
.ki5l2
.ki5n4a
.ki3r4a
.ko3h
.ko3ki
.ko3la
.ko5na
.ko5nga
.kop3l
.ko3ra
.krasi6
.kro3n
.ku5l4a
.ku3m4a
.ku3pi
.kut4
.ku3ta
.ku3ti
.kutuk5
.la1h2
.la3m4a
.la5ngi
.lap2
.la3pa
.la3ra
.larik5
.la5sa
.lawa7
.lawang6
.leba5r
.le5na
.le5ng6a
.le5ngo
.lep5r
.le3sa
.liku3
.li5la
.li3ma
.limas5
.limun5
.li5n4a
.li5ni
.li3pa
.li3sa
.lo3k4a
.lo3ki
.lo5na
.lo5ng6a
.lo3ra
.lo3t
.lua7
.luang6
.lu3p
.lu3ti
.ma3ir
.maja5k
.ma3ka
.ma5ki
.mal4a
.ma5lan
.ma6lun.
.ma5ng6a
.ma6nga.
.ma3ni
.manta5
.ma3pr
.ma3ra
.mas4a
.ma5san
.ma5t4a
.ma3ti
.me5la
.menko5
.mig3r
.mi3ra
.mi7s4a
.mis5in
.mos3t
.mu5ka
.mu5n4a
.mu5ra
.mut4
.mu5tan
.na3hi
.na3i
.na5li
.na5pi
.na3ut
.neu5t
.ng4
.ni3s4a
.ni3t
.no2n
.no5ri
.nug5r
.nu5ra
.nut2
.nu3ta
.nut3r
.nya5ma
.oba2
.ob1l
.oda5
.odol5
.odo3r
.oka5
.ok1l
.olo2
.omo2
.on2a
.ongo4
.ongol5
.op3l
.opo3s
.op3r
.ora4
.ose5a
.os3p
.os5t
.otak3
.oven3
.pahem5
.pa3ka
.palak5
.pa5li
.pa3ma
.pa5ng6a
.pa3r4a
.pa3s4a
.pa4us
.peja5l
.pe3ka
.pe5lan
.peli5k
.pe7ran
.pe3t4a
.pe5te
.pi3ra
.pla5no
.plato5
.po3l4a
.po5lan
.poli3
.ponak5
.po3ra
.pu3ki
.pu5l4a
.pu5n4a
.pu3ti
.rai3r
.ra5ka
.rangi5
.rangin6
.ra3p
.ra3r
.rara5
.rarang6
.ra3s4a
.rebus5
.re3gr
.re3ka
.rek5re
.re5nga
.re3sa
.re3u
.ri3b
.ri5ng6a
.risik5
.ros3t
.ro3t2
.ru3ha
.ru3ka
.ru1t2
.sa3fa
.sa3h4a
.sa3hi
.sa3ki
.sa3la
.sa3m4a
.sa5ng6a
.sa5pa
.sa3r4a
.sa3sa
.sa3ti
.sa3uk3
.se3h
.se3ka
.se5l4a
.sela5p
.se5ngi
.se5ra
.se3sa
.se3ta
.setik5
.se5tu
.simbu5
.si3na
.si5ni
.so3t
.su3ka
.su3ki
.su3m4a
.su5n4a
.sut2
.su3ta
.tab3l
.ta3h4a
.ta3hi
.ta5ki.
.ta3m4a
.ta5na
.ta5ng6a
.tapak5
.ta3r4a
.ta5ri
.tasa5w
.ta5usa
.tebuk5
.te3ka
.te3ki
.teko5r
.te5l4a
.te3ma
.te5nga
.te2r
.teram6a
.te7r6an.
.ti3ba
.ti1h
.tik5an
.til4
.ti5la
.ti5mi
.ti5ngi
.tir4
.ti3ra
.ti3s
.tol2
.to5la
.to3ma
.tro3p
.tu5a
.tu3hi
.tu3m4a
.tu5n4a
.tu5ngi
.tu3ni
.tu3p
.tu5ra
.tu3ri
.ua2
.ub4
.uba2
.uban5
.ubu4
.ubur3
.uga2
.uge4
.uja2
.ul2a
.ulak3
.ulam3
.um2a
.umi2
.undak5
.ung4a4
.ungap5
.ungga6
.up2
.ura4
.urak5a
.ure5ta
.urit5
.usi2
.usik3
.ut2
.uta4
.utak3
.ut3r
.wa3h4a
.wa3hi
.wa3ni
.wa3sa
.wa3t2
.we3t4
.wu5t
.ya3ki
.ya3ng
.yo5nga
.yu3d
.za3ir
.za3ma
a3a
a5ad
aa2f1
aala2
aa2li
a5an
aa3r
aa4t1
a1b
a5ba.
abad5ab
3abadi
abah4a
abai3
3abaik
aba4k7
aba7ka
ab3akr
ab3aks
aba5ru
aba3s
abas5ab
abata3
abatang6
abeda3
abeku3
3abena
abe3ra
a3bir
abi4ri
abi4si
ab1l
1abn
abobo3
ab3r
ab5rik
abrit5
5abs
abs7tr
abuh1
abu2r
abu3s
a1c
aca2k
aca2p
4acar.
ace2
acem3
acet1
2aci
aci2k
acili3
acing4
aci3t2
a2c5r
acu4k
acu2m3
a1d
4adah
2adal
adali3
adarus5
2adas
adas4a
ada4t
a5dav
a5de
3adeg
1adeh
ade2p
adesa4
a3di
4adi.
4adia
adi1h
1adil
4adim
adisi5p
5adm
1adop
ado5r
ad3r
1ads
1adud
adur4a
adu1t2
1adv
a1e
2aeh
a2e1k
a3el
aen5ism
ae3r
a2ero3
a1f
a2fan
afa3u
1afd
afi3b4
afik7
a2f1l
a3flo
af3ru
a1g
ag2a
aga2h1
aga2i
5agamaa
a3gand
agasa5r
aga3si
agas4k
agen4a
agesa3
aget4a
ag2h
a3gha
a3g2i
4agi.
a5gi5a
a2gl
ag3la
ag2o
ago3k2
ago4na
agong5
a2gr
ag3rat
1agre
ag7ri
ag5ro
agu5ka
agul2
2agu2m
agum3a
agut1
a3ha.
a3hab
a3hak
a3hani
ah3any
ahari3
ah3art
a1haw
4ahe
ahe2m
a2hen
ah3eng
a1hir
ah3ism
ahit3
a1hiy
a1ho
ah1og
a3hon
4ahu
a3hu.
a3hua
a2hub
ahu5r
ah1uy
a1iah
ai5an
a1ib.
aib3an
aibi5
a1ibk
ai3br
a1id
a3id.
a7ie
a1if
a1ih
a1ik.
a3ikat
a2iku
a1il.
ail2a
a3ilau
a1ilk
a1ilm
a1ilo
aima4l
a3imb
a1i2n
ai3ny
ai3p
a1ir
ai4ri
a1is
a3is.
a2i3sa
a2isy
a1it
a3it.
ai2ta
a3iti
a1iw
a1iy
a1j
ajah7
ajak7
aja4ri
ajat4a
ajemuk5
aje5nga
aje4r
aje5ra
ajir3a
aj1l
1ajo
aj5r
aju3m2
ajung4
1ajus
aka4ba
a5kabu
a2kac
ak3acu
a2k1ag
ak3aja
ak5alam
akam4a
a5kar.
ak5arif
ak3asl
ak3aut
akawas5
ak1ef
ak1eg
ak3ema
ak5enak5
ak3ent
a5ker
ak3esa
aket5a
ak3har
ak3hu
akia3
1akib
a2kic
aki1h
aki2m
ak3imb
akina3
akinang6
akin3y
ak3isa
aki2t
ak1l
ak5la
akme5ng
a3ko
a4kob
a4kog
4akok
3akomo
a5kon
akon5is
a5kor
a4kot
a2koy
2akp
ak3r
ak5ri
ak6rit
akroa3
ak5rob
ak5rom
akro3n
a5kronu5
ak5ru
aks2
3aksar
ak3st
aktor5a
aktual7
aku3k
ak3und
a5kut
a1l
alaba5k
a5lah
a5laj
a5lal
a6lamatk
a5lana
a5lang
a3lant
a5las
al5awar
aleba3
ale5na
a5lia
3alial
1alie
a3lif
a5lig
1ali2h
ali5la
alili5p
alima5s
a5lin
alin7a
3aline
5alingi
ali4r
a3lis.
a5lit
5alkal
1alko
alog5an
alo3ki
alon3a
along6a
alot2
alto3
alu3k
2alum
alu3ma
alu2n
alu4r
5alv
a2man
aman5is
amapa3
amar7
ama5ri
a5mat
amat5r
a3mau
am5ayam5
ambah3
ambai3
4ambak
6amban.
amba5s
ambe5l
4ambi.
ambil7
5ambila
ambin5a
6ambingh
3ambis
3ambiy
ambo3k
ambuk3
ambu5la
amel4a
amen5s
amensa5
2amer
amer5an
ami7k
amla3
amoda3
among4
amo4t
2ampa
ampak3
ampir3
amplo5k
6ampung
5ampuni
ampu4r
2amu
amuga5
2ana
a3na3g
anak7
anal4a
ana5le
3anali
3analo
an1an
an7ang4
ana3pa
ana3pl
anata5
5ancama
2anci
2an5d
5andala
5andalk
3andam
anda4s
andata7
andek3
andera5
ando3k
and5ro.
an1ed
1aneh
an1ej
ane4n
an3eng
an3eur
2ang
a3ngab
ang3ac
a3ngaj
a3ngak
ang3al
a5ngana5
a5ngani
a3ngap
a3ngar
a3ngas
a3ngat
a5ngau
ang5aw
ang5aya
a3nge
ang5ero
7anggel
ang4i
a3ngik
a3ngil
ang5im
a3ngin
ang5inc
a5ngir
a3ngis
7angkaa
angke5t
5angkuh
angkuk5
ang5l
3anglo
a1ngo
4ango.
ango5l
a5ngom
angon5a
a1ngu
a5nguk
ang5ulu
ang5unc
a5ngur
angu3t4
ang5uta
2anh
2ani
ania3
3aniay
an3iko
a5nin
aning3
ani3r2
an3iri
ani6si.
anja4l
4anjan
anjang5
anja4r
4anji
anju2
2ank
2anl
2anm
5ann
2a3no
anod3r
4anog
ano3m
an3ont
an3opt
2anr
2ans
an6sitiv
ans5p
2ant
anta7ka
anta7ra
5antari
3antep
5antiha
antil4
5antoni
anu3g
anu3ma
anu5r
an3ura
anut3
2anv
2a3ny
anya4k
anyali5
an3z
a1o
a2oe
ao2k1
a3op
a5ot
a1p
a2pac
ap5adap
apahe3
apak3i
ap5alap
3apam
a2p1an
apa5ri
3apart
apas7a
ape3k
a2pen
ap3ena
ape5ri
apes3a
ape3t4
7apia
3apiap
a5pid
api5l2
api5na
a3pi3r
a3pi4s
5apitan
ap1l
aplak3
1ap3li
3aplu
apme5
a3po
apo5kro
3apolo
apo5t
3apote
a2pr
a4p3rat
3ap3ri
ap3rof
ap3rog
a5pron
ap3rop
ap3ru
ap2si
ap3st
a4p5ud
apu1t
1aqs
a5ra.
a5rac
a5rah
arah5ar
a5rai
ar2ak
ara3kr
ar7aks
a5rala
a3rana
ara4ng
ar7angg
ara4ni
a3rans
5aranse
a3rant
a5rap
arapa5t
ara4pi
a5r4as
aratolo6
arawi5t
arce1
arena5
aret1
argu3
a5ria
a5rid
arida5
3arihk
a5rik
a5rion
ar5ioti
a5ris.
a5rit
arit5an
a3riu
arko5
arman4
armant5
arma3t4
ar5n2
a4rond
a2ror
arorga5
ar5s
4arse1
arta3k
a3ru.
arua3n
aruang6
aru3ka
aru3ki
aru4l
aru2m
arung3
5arungi
aru3ni
a5ru2s
arus4a
aru3si
a1s
as5agu
asa4h
a5sai4
5asakas
asa3ki
as1an
a3sand
asa2p
asar7a
a5sas
3asas.
3asask
ase3ka
as3emp
ase5ra
asia4l7
a5sik
asi6k5al
asi7kl
3asimi
asi4ng3
3asini
3asink
asi2s
as5kan
3askas
as3kr
as5la
3asmar
asme4
a5so
1aspi
as2po
3asram
astero5
as3ti
as4til
astri5
as5tro
a5su
asu2h1
asuk1
3asums
asu5r
2asus
a2sy
1asyi
asyik3
a1t
a2ta
a3tab
a3ta3g
a5tai
ata3in
ata7ka
at1an
a5tan4a
ata4ni
a3tans
a3tant
a5ta2p
3atapk
ata3pl
ata2s
4atasi
a3ta4t
ata3us
at5awat
a3tay
ate3ki
ate5l
at3emp
ate3ra
ateror5
ateros5
a5tet
at3ha
at4he
a3thi
a2ti.
atif4a
ati3kr
a5tim
ati3ma
ating4
ati5nga
a5ti3p
ati4ra
a5tis
at5l
ato5a
ato3b
ato3h
a4t3ore
atos3f
at3r
at5ri.
3atrib
atri5ka
5atris
at5rol
atu5ak
a2ua
a3uco
auda5
1audi
a3uh.
a2uha
aui5
a1uk.
au3ka
a1ukp
a2uku
a3ul.
a1ulh
aulu3
a3ulua
a1um.
au2ma
aume1
1aumk
a1un
a3un.
a3ung
auni4
a3up.
au3pi
a1ur
a3ur.
a3uran
aur3au
a3urin
a3uro
a5us.
a1ut
a3uta
a3utk
1auto
a1uw
a1uy
a2uz
a1v
a1w
a3wa
4awa.
awa2k
2awal
3awale
awa4ng
4awar
awa4s
5awasi.
2awat
awer2
1awet
2a3wi
awig5
awo3k
awu2t
a1x
a1y
a5ya
aya7ka
aya3ki
aya2l1
aya2r
ayida5
1ayom
ayu2b
ayud3h
3ayuna
3ayunk
ayur4a
a1z
a3zi
babak3
babat4
babe5
baca5k4
5bad
ba4dab
bada4n
bada5r
3bag
ba3ga
3bah
ba4h5ab
baha5l
ba4ham
ba3he
bah3ub
ba1i2b
ba2id
ba1i2k
bai5r
3baj
baji4k3
3bak
5bak.
ba4k7an
ba5kar
ba4kh
bak5hir
4bakr
3bal
balak7
bala7ng6a
bale3
bali2
balik3
balin4
bali5na
bali5sa
ba5lo
bamba7
b1amp
ban4a
ban7an
5bang
bangga5
bangka7
bangkal6
bangkar6
bangkas6
ban5ism
ba4n3ol
banto3
bantu5k
banyak5
bapak3
bapa5ni
bap3l
ba3pr
bara6ban
bara3h4
bara5ka
bara3p4
ba7ri
ba4ri.
baria3
ba4rib
ba5rin
bar5ism
baro3s
ba3ru
ba4rum
baru3s
ba4sab
3bat
bata5r4
ba1u
ba5ur
ba5us
bawa3k
baya3t
2b1b
4b5d
3be.
bebal4
beban5a
bebesa5
bebesar6
beca2
beda5ka
be3f
be5g
be3ha
3bei
bek5an.
bek1l
b2el
bel2a
bel3aj
bela5ti
belek5a
be4lem
bele5ma
bele5r
be7li
be4li.
be5lo
belu3h
bel5unj
benah5
bena5k
bena4r
be3nga
be3nge
be3ngi
be5ngis
be5ngo
be5ngu
beni3t
be2n1o
benum3
bep3h
3be2r7
ber5aba
ber5aca
ber3ad
ber3ag
be5ra3h4
be5raja
bera5ka
ber5anc
bera7nga
be5rani
ber5anj
be5rany
be4rap
ber5api
bera5pr
ber3ar
ber5ase
bera6sim
ber5aso
be4rat
ber3aw
ber3ay
be4ref
ber3ej
bere5ka
ber5ema
be5rend
ber5ene
ber5ero
bere6si
ber3ev
ber5iba
ber3im
ber5ini
ber5ipa
ber3ir
ber3is
berisi5
ber3iu
berna5k
ber3ob
berok4
ber5oks
ber3ol
ber5omo
ber3op
ber5osi
bero3t
be5roti
ber5oto
ber5s
ber3ud
ber5uji
ber5uku
ber3ul
ber5umu
ber5und
ber5uny
ber5usi
ber5uta
be3si
bete3k
bete3s
b1etn
betu2
2b1f
2b1g
2b2h2
bhu1
bia2k1
bian3i
bi2b1a
3bic
bi4d3ah
bida5r
bida4s
bi3f
bi3g
3bik
bi3kr
biku3
bi4lal
bi4lam
bil5amb
bil5ism
bima3
bin2a
bi3ngi
bi3ni
bi5o
bio1k
bio3sf
bio4sk
bi3p4
bi5rin
bis4a
bisi4k3
bi4s5k
bi2ta
bi3t4i
biul3
2b1j
bja2d
2b5k
bku1
bkut2
2bl
bla2g
bla2k1
blawa5
blawan6
b2le.
ble5ngo
bles1
b1li
blim5an
5b6lisir
b2lo.
3b2log
blon3a
blos3
b1lu
blubu5
2b1m
2b1n
b2o
3bo.
6boboti
bodo5l
bodor5
3boi
bo2k7a
bo3li
bo5lo
bolo3s
bombo5n
3bon
bon2a
bong4a
bo3nge
bo4ngo
bong5os
bo4p3l
b3oral
bor5s
bosi3
bo4si.
bos5t
botek3
bot3is
botol5
bo4t5r
2b3p
2b2r2
bra2k
brak3a
branja5
b4ra3t
5brato.
b5rator
b4ri.
3b4rid.
b5rif
brik5an
bris4
bro3b
brono3
b5rua
bruk1
b4rut
2b3s4
bse4
bsosi4
b7st
bstrak5
bs5tru
2b3t
3bu
bua3ni
bu2bi
budak3
bud3h
bu2ha
bu2he
bu2il
bujuk5a
bu7ka
buk7an
bu1kh
bul2a
bula3h
bulak3
bu3lis
bu4lub
buluk3
bun3ab
bungke5
bu7ni
buntu5k
bu3rad
bura5ka
bu4ri.
burit5
bu5su
bu5tah
but3um
2b1v
2b1w
2b1y
bya2
byak1
byo2
2b1z
cab4
cabi2
cabik3
cab5l
ca3br
cabu2
cabul3
cacing5
cada2
ca3e
ca3hi
ca1il
ca5im
ca3ir
ca4k3an
cak5ic
cak5r
ca3k6ri
ca1kw
ca3l
ca4l3en
ca5li
ca2ma
can3ac
cana5k
canang5
candu5k
ca2ni
cantik5
canti5l
cap3ac
cap3l
ca3pr
cara5k
ca2ti
ca3t4r
cat2s
ca1ul
ca1us
cebu2
ce2h
cekak7
ceka6kan
cek3ec
ce3ki
ce7k1l
cek4le
ceku3k
cela6ki
celi1
cema4
cema5n
cemar3
ce7nga
ce3nge
cengge6m
ce3ngi
ce5ngu
cepek3
cep3l
cera3k
ceria3
cermi4
cermin5
cerna5
cetek3
ce2u
2c2h
chi5
ciba2
cibak3
cibir5
cib3l
cika5
cike5
ci2l
ci3li
